Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,139
Remodeled, defined.

Remodeled shall mean the alteration or reconstruction of an existing building for which a building permit is required to be obtained by the local political subdivision.

Laws 1981, LB 296, § 8.